Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 2. General Provisions

§ 16-12-201.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Director” or “district director” means a voting member of the governing body of a special district or other specified entity, regardless of what title is used in the principal act;

“Principal act” means the statutes under which a special district or other specified entity listed under W.S. 16-12-202(a) is formed or is operating;

“Special district or other specified entity” means an entity listed under W.S. 16-12-202(a).

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-202.
Applicability to special districts and other specified entities; general provisions.

This chapter applies to the following entities unless otherwise specified:

Airport joint powers boards;

Cemetery districts;

Conservation districts;

Fire protection districts;

Flood control districts;

Housing authorities;

Improvement and service districts;

Joint powers boards;

Local improvement districts;

Museum districts;

Predator management districts;

Recreation boards of trustees appointed pursuant to W.S.

18-9-201

;

Recreation joint powers boards;

Regional transportation authorities;

Resort districts;

Rural health care districts;

Sanitary and improvement districts;

Senior citizens’ districts;

Solid waste disposal districts;

Water and sewer districts;

Water conservancy districts;

Watershed improvement districts;

Weed and pest districts;

Other districts as specified by law.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “boards of trustees appointed pursuant to W.S.

18-9-201

” for “districts” in (a)(xii).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

Construction.—

By the Special District Public Records and Meetings Act, the legislature included airport joint powers boards alongside special districts, treated them equally, and declared the Wyoming Public Records Act (WPRA) controlling; this is a clear expression of the legislature’s understanding and intention that all the entities subject to the Special District Act are likewise subject to the WPRA’s disclosure requirements. Wyo. Jet Ctr., LLC v. Jackson Hole Airport Bd., 2019 WY 6, 432 P.3d 910,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2019).